Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1721
Seller-assisted marketing plan; renewal or extension of existing plan; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include the renewal or extension of an existing seller-assisted marketing plan contract.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 21.